lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX Q as      iausiosios      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajai       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiàjà        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiàja        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiojoje      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiojoj       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausioji       das
SFX Q as      þiausiosios     das
SFX Q as      þiausiajai      das
SFX Q as      þiausiàjà       das
SFX Q as      þiausiàja       das
SFX Q as      þiausiojoje     das
SFX Q as      þiausiojoj      das
SFX Q s       usioji          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosios        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajai         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiàjà          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiàja          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojoje        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojoj         [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausioji       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiosios     tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiajai      tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiàjà       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiàja       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiojoje     tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiojoj      tas
SFX Q us      iausioji        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosios      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajai       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiàjà        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiàja        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojoje      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojoj       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausioji       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiosios     dus
SFX Q us      þiausiajai      dus
SFX Q us      þiausiàjà       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiàja       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiojoje     dus
SFX Q us      þiausiojoj      dus
SFX Q us      ausioji         jus
SFX Q us      ausiosios       jus
SFX Q us      ausiajai        jus
SFX Q us      ausiàjà         jus
SFX Q us      ausiàja         jus
SFX Q us      ausiojoje       jus
SFX Q us      ausiojoj        jus
SFX Q tus     èiausioji       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiosios     tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiajai      tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiàjà       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiàja       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiojoje     tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiojoj      tus
SFX Q as      iausieji        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiøjø        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiesiems     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuosius     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiaisiais    [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuosiuose   [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausieji       das
SFX Q as      þiausiøjø       das
SFX Q as      þiausiesiems    das
SFX Q as      þiausiuosius    das
SFX Q as      þiausiaisiais   das
SFX Q as      þiausiuosiuose  das
SFX Q s       usieji          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiøjø          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiesiems       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuosius       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiaisiais      [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuosiuose     [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausieji       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiøjø       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiesiems    tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiuosius    tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiaisiais   tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiuosiuose  tas
SFX Q us      iausieji        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiøjø        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiesiems     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuosius     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiaisiais    [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuosiuose   [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausieji       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiøjø       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiesiems    dus
SFX Q us      þiausiuosius    dus
SFX Q us      þiausiaisiais   dus
SFX Q us      þiausiuosiuose  dus
SFX Q us      ausieji         jus
SFX Q us      ausiøjø         jus
SFX Q us      ausiesiems      jus
SFX Q us      ausiuosius      jus
SFX Q us      ausiaisiais     jus
SFX Q us      ausiuosiuose    jus
SFX Q tus     èiausieji       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiøjø       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiesiems    tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiuosius    tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiaisiais   tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiuosiuose  tus
SFX Q as      iausiosioms     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiàsias      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiosiomis    [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiosiose     [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausiosioms    das
SFX Q as      þiausiàsias     das
SFX Q as      þiausiosiomis   das
SFX Q as      þiausiosiose    das
SFX Q s       usiosioms       [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiàsias        [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosiomis      [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiosiose       [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausiosioms    tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiàsias     tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiosiomis   tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiosiose    tas
SFX Q us      iausiosioms     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiàsias      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosiomis    [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiosiose     [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausiosioms    dus
SFX Q us      þiausiàsias     dus
SFX Q us      þiausiosiomis   dus
SFX Q us      þiausiosiose    dus
SFX Q us      ausiosioms      jus
SFX Q us      ausiàsias       jus
SFX Q us      ausiosiomis     jus
SFX Q us      ausiosiose      jus
SFX Q tus     èiausiosioms    tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiàsias     tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiosiomis   tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiosiose    tus
SFX Q s       i               as
SFX Q us      iai             [^j]us
SFX Q us      ai              jus
SFX Q as      iau             [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiau            das
SFX Q s       u               [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiau            tas
SFX Q us      iau             [^dtj]us
SFX Q us      þiau            dus
SFX Q tus     èiau            tus
SFX Q us      au              jus
SFX Q is      þiausiai        dis
SFX Q s       0               as
SFX Q s       0               us
SFX Q as      umas            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umo             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umui            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umà             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umu             [^i]as
SFX Q as      ume             [^i]as
SFX Q ias     umas            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umo             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umui            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umà             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umu             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ume             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tumas           èias
SFX Q èias    tumo            èias
SFX Q èias    tumui           èias
SFX Q èias    tumà            èias
SFX Q èias    tumu            èias
SFX Q èias    tume            èias
SFX Q s       mas             us
SFX Q s       mo              us
SFX Q s       mui             us
SFX Q s       mà              us
SFX Q s       mu              us
SFX Q s       me              us
SFX Q as      umai            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umø             [^i]as
SFX Q as      umams           [^i]as
SFX Q as      umus            [^i]as
SFX Q as      umais           [^i]as
SFX Q as      umuose          [^i]as
SFX Q ias     umai            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umø             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umams           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umus            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umais           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     umuose          [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tumai           èias
SFX Q èias    tumø            èias
SFX Q èias    tumams          èias
SFX Q èias    tumus           èias
SFX Q èias    tumais          èias
SFX Q èias    tumuose         èias
SFX Q s       mai             us
SFX Q s       mø              us
SFX Q s       mams            us
SFX Q s       mus             us
SFX Q s       mais            us
SFX Q s       muose           us
SFX Q as      okai            [^i]as
SFX Q èias    tokai           èias
SFX Q ias     okai            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q us      okai            us
SFX Q as      okas            [^i]as
SFX Q as      oko             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okam            [^i]as
SFX Q as      okà             [^i]as
SFX Q as      oku             [^i]as
SFX Q as      okame           [^i]as
SFX Q ias     okas            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     oko             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     okam            [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     okà             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     oku             [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     okame           [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tokas           èias
SFX Q èias    toko            èias
SFX Q èias    tokam           èias
SFX Q èias    tokà            èias
SFX Q èias    toku            èias
SFX Q èias    tokame          èias
SFX Q us      okas            us
SFX Q us      oko             us
SFX Q us      okam            us
SFX Q us      okà             us
