lib/dict/lt.dic
ğabloniğkas/BNQ
agresyvus/BNQ
ğaipus/BNQ
akademiğkas/BNQ
akmeningas/BNQ
aktualus/BNQ
aliejuotas/BNQ
alpus/BNQ
ambicingas/BNQ
anatomiğkas/BNQ
ankstyvas/BNQ
antiislamiğkas/BNQ
apetitiğkas/BNQ
apkantus/BNQ
aptakus/BNQ
şargoniğkas/BNQ
arğus/BNQ
atşangus/BNQ
atğiaurus/BNQ
atlağus/BNQ
atsajus/BNQ
ağtuoneriopas/BNQ
augalotas/BNQ
ausylas/BNQ
şavus/BNQ
balnas/BNQ
barbariğkas/BNQ
baugus/BNQ
bendras/BNQ
beteisiğkas/BNQ
blaivas/BNQ
blukus/BNQ
brankus/BNQ
budrus/BNQ
charizmatiğkas/BNQ
dagiuotas/BNQ
dalykiğkas/BNQ
darbininkiğkas/BNQ
darus/BNQ
defektyvus/BNQ
demokratiğkas/BNQ
devyneriopas/BNQ
dilgus/BNQ
disciplinuotas/BNQ
dûlus/BNQ
doringas/BNQ
draskus/BNQ
dribus/BNQ
drûtas/BNQ
dëslus/BNQ
dulkus/BNQ
duoslus/BNQ
dvasus/BNQ
dvynas/BNQ
egliğkas/BNQ
ğeimyniğkas/BNQ
ekstravertiğkas/BNQ
şelmeningas/BNQ
empatiğkas/BNQ
ğerdingas/BNQ
erğkëtingas/BNQ
faktiğkas/BNQ
finansiğkas/BNQ
gailestingas/BNQ
gaivingas/BNQ
ganëtinas/BNQ
garingas/BNQ
gûdus/BNQ
gelsvas/BNQ
gerklingas/BNQ
ágimtas/BNQ
gyvatiğkas/BNQ
glebus/BNQ
gluodnas/BNQ
grabus/BNQ
graudulingas/BNQ
griaudus/BNQ
grobikiğkas/BNQ
gruzdus/BNQ
gurus/BNQ
humaniğkas/BNQ
şiaurus/BNQ
idiotiğkas/BNQ
iğganingas/BNQ
iğkilnus/BNQ
èilietiğkas/BNQ
iğmanus/BNQ
induktyvus/BNQ
inovatoriğkas/BNQ
iğoriğkas/BNQ
şirginiuotas/BNQ
isteriğkas/BNQ
iğtvermingas/BNQ
iğvaizdus/BNQ
ypatus/BNQ
jautrus/BNQ
juodas/BNQ
juslus/BNQ
kalbiğkas/BNQ
ákalnus/BNQ
kamğlus/BNQ
kanibaliğkas/BNQ
karingas/BNQ
kasdieniğkas/BNQ
kaulingas/BNQ
keleriopas/BNQ
kenksmingas/BNQ
keterotas/BNQ
kiautuotas/BNQ
kilnus/BNQ
kiriliğkas/BNQ
klaikus/BNQ
kliautingas/BNQ
kûlëtas/BNQ
kûniğkas/BNQ
kolektyviğkas/BNQ
komunikabilus/BNQ
konspiratyvus/BNQ
kosulingas/BNQ
kraujingas/BNQ
kreğus/BNQ
ákrypas/BNQ
kruvinas/BNQ
kuokğtiğkas/BNQ
kvaiğas/BNQ
laidus/BNQ
laipus/BNQ
lakus/BNQ
ğlauningas/BNQ
leistinas/BNQ
lesus/BNQ
liepsnotas/BNQ
álinkas/BNQ
liurbiğkas/BNQ
lyriğkas/BNQ
lomotas/BNQ
ğluotëtas/BNQ
ğmaikğtus/BNQ
maloningas/BNQ
ámantrus/BNQ
ûmas/BNQ
maurinas/BNQ
meilingas/BNQ
melsvas/BNQ
mëgiamas/BNQ
miestiğkas/BNQ
miltingas/BNQ
miğrus/BNQ
mënesëtas/BNQ
moksleiviğkas/BNQ
monolitiğkas/BNQ
máslingas/BNQ
murkğlinas/BNQ
naginëtas/BNQ
narus/BNQ
neapsakomas/BNQ
neiğvengiamas/BNQ
nendrëtas/BNQ
neregëtas/BNQ
neáveikiamas/BNQ
nirtingas/BNQ
nominalus/BNQ
numaningas/BNQ
nuogas/BNQ
nuolaikus/BNQ
nuostovus/BNQ
obskurantiğkas/BNQ
ğokus/BNQ
organiğkas/BNQ
pağaipingas/BNQ
padorus/BNQ
pagyrûniğkas/BNQ
paşinus/BNQ
pakasus/BNQ
palaimingas/BNQ
pamiğëliğkas/BNQ
paprastas/BNQ
parûgotas/BNQ
pasaulietiğkas/BNQ
paskidas/BNQ
pastiras/BNQ
patyrus/BNQ
pavalgus/BNQ
pavëluotas/BNQ
pelëkas/BNQ
perifrastiğkas/BNQ
peruotas/BNQ
pieningas/BNQ
piktnaudiğkas/BNQ
ûpingas/BNQ
pjûkliğkas/BNQ
plaukuotas/BNQ
pliukğnas/BNQ
plunksniğkas/BNQ
pompastiğkas/BNQ
praşambus/BNQ
prakaulus/BNQ
pramirkas/BNQ
prasèiokiğkas/BNQ
praşulnus/BNQ
prideramas/BNQ
priekabingas/BNQ
prieğtarus/BNQ
primityvus/BNQ
privatus/BNQ
proporcingas/BNQ
proziğkas/BNQ
pumpuruotas/BNQ
purvuotas/BNQ
puveningas/BNQ
raiğas/BNQ
raişus/BNQ
rantuotas/BNQ
raukğlëtas/BNQ
reaktyvus/BNQ
reiklus/BNQ
renkamas/BNQ
revoliucingas/BNQ
rievëtas/BNQ
ritmingas/BNQ
ryştingas/BNQ
romantiğkas/BNQ
rudas/BNQ
rusvas/BNQ
sakinas/BNQ
salingas/BNQ
sargaliotas/BNQ
saulëtas/BNQ
savavaliğkas/BNQ
savitas/BNQ
seilëtas/BNQ
senyvas/BNQ
siauraprotiğkas/BNQ
sieringas/BNQ
simboliğkas/BNQ
sintetiğkas/BNQ
skaitlingas/BNQ
skarotas/BNQ
skersuotas/BNQ
skystimingas/BNQ
sëkmingas/BNQ
skrupulingas/BNQ
skurdus/BNQ
slaugus/BNQ
slënus/BNQ
smailus/BNQ
smilgëtas/BNQ
smuklus/BNQ
sànaudingas/BNQ
sodrus/BNQ
sotus/BNQ
spekuliatyvus/BNQ
spontaniğkas/BNQ
sprudus/BNQ
sriaunus/BNQ
stabilus/BNQ
standus/BNQ
status/BNQ
stingus/BNQ
ástrişas/BNQ
sumatus/BNQ
svajus/BNQ
átaigus/BNQ
tanus/BNQ
taupus/BNQ
tekus/BNQ
tikimas/BNQ
tişus/BNQ
totoriğkas/BNQ
trigubas/BNQ
trumparegiğkas/BNQ
tvanus/BNQ
uşkampus/BNQ
uogingas/BNQ
usnëtas/BNQ
vaiğingas/BNQ
vaiğus/BNQ
áşvalgus/BNQ
vapus/BNQ
varpingas/BNQ
veidrodiğkas/BNQ
veltëdiğkas/BNQ
verpstiğkas/BNQ
vienalytiğkas/BNQ
vientisas/BNQ
vilningas/BNQ
virğkus/BNQ
vizualus/BNQ
vëlybas/BNQ
zirzlus/BNQ
